Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 22. Office of Administrative Hearings

§ 9-2-2201.
Office created; appointment of director and hearing examiners.

The office of administrative hearings is created as a separate operating agency pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1704(d).

The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a director of the office who shall serve as the administrative head of the office and as chief hearing examiner. Unless sooner removed, the director’s term of appointment expires at the end of the term of office of the governor during which he was appointed. The director serves at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall be a member in good standing of the Wyoming state bar.

The director may appoint additional hearing examiners who are members in good standing of the Wyoming state bar to serve either full or part time as necessary throughout the state. Hearing examiners serve at the pleasure of the director and may be removed by him at any time without cause.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 30, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to hearings on driver's license suspension for nonpayment of child support, see §

20-6-111

.

Cited

in

State Transp. Comm'n v. Ford, 844 P.2d 496,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 9-2-2202.
Duties and function of office.

The office of administrative hearings is the successor agency to the office of independent hearing examiners created by W.S.

27-14-602

and the office of hearing examiners created by W.S.

31-7-105

. Effective July 1, 1992:

There is transferred to the office of administrative hearings all positions, personnel, property and appropriated funds of the office of independent hearing examiners and the office of hearing examiners;

The office of administrative hearings shall assume all duties and responsibilities and exercise all authority of the office of independent hearing examiners and the office of hearing examiners set out in title 27, chapter 14 and title 31, chapters 6, 7, 9 and 17 of the Wyoming statutes.

In addition to conducting hearings pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the office of administrative hearings may, if requested, provide hearing services for any other state agency, provided:

Hearing services shall be provided to other agencies subject to available resources;

The cost of the hearing services as determined by the director of the office of administrative hearings shall be paid by the requesting agency to the office of administrative hearings;

Hearings will be conducted in an impartial manner pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, applicable provisions of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and any rules for the conduct of contested cases adopted by the director of the office of administrative hearings which shall take precedence over hearing rules promulgated by the requesting agency. In the case of personnel hearings conducted pursuant to W.S.

9-2-3206

, the state personnel rules shall govern the conduct of the hearings;

Hearings may be held in any area of the state giving consideration to the resources of the office of administrative hearings and the convenience of the parties.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 30, § 1; 1997, ch. 88, § 1; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3206" for "9-2-1019" in the second sentence of (b)(iii).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-2203.
Rulemaking authority.

The director of the office of administrative hearings shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the functions and responsibilities assigned to the office.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 30, § 1.